esutoy.lexc
LEXICON Root
NounRoot;
VerbRoot;


LEXICON NounRoot
caribou:tuntu           NounDeriv;
village:nuna            NounDeriv;
boat:angyar             NounDeriv;
ice.cream:akutar        NounDeriv;
river:kuig              NounDeriv;
person:yug              NounDeriv;
dog:qimugte             NounDeriv;



LEXICON VerbRoot
work:cali               VerbDeriv;
eat:nere                VerbDeriv;
play:aqui               VerbDeriv;
sleep:qavar             VerbDeriv;
be.good:assir           VerbDeriv;
study:elitnaur          VerbDeriv;
be.hungry:kaig          VerbDeriv;



LEXICON NounDeriv
NounInfl;

-big:-rpag              NounDeriv;
! -baby:-yagar            NounDeriv;
-fake:~+(ng)uar         NounDeriv;

-to.make:-li            VerbDeriv;
-to.lack:~:(ng)ite       VerbDeriv;



LEXICON VerbDeriv
VerbInfl;

-PST:-llru              VerbDeriv;
-again:-nqigte          VerbDeriv;
! -A'.say:~+ni           VerbDeriv;

-one.who:+(s)te          NounDeriv;
-place.to.V:~+vig       NounDeriv;



LEXICON VerbInfl
-IND.3sg:~+(g)(t)uq     EncliticOrEnd;
-IND.1sg.3sg:~+(g)aqa   EncliticOrEnd;



LEXICON NounInfl
\ABS.sg:0               EncliticOrEnd;
-ABS.1sg.sg:-ka         EncliticOrEnd;



LEXICON EncliticOrEnd
#;
=QST:=qaa               EncliticOrEnd;
=reported:=gguq         EncliticOrEnd;
